Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2302
Costs of action.

In any civil or criminal case in which a party is permitted to proceed in forma pauperis, the court shall direct the responsible officer of the court to issue and serve all the necessary writs, process, and proceedings and perform all such duties without charge.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 5.